Missouri, session 2026, HB3161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 393.1685, to read as follows:
393.1685. 1. No public utility, as such term is defined in section 295.020, shall
H
require additional deposits or transfer fees to transfer services to the spouse of the
account holder when the account is in good standing and the account holder:
(1) DieTs;
(2) Is deported; or
(3)IIs incarcerated for more than sixty days.
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, a new
W
deposit may be required if:
(a) The spouse has an unpaid bill within the last five years that, at the time of the
transfer request, remains unpaid and is not the subject of a dispute with any public
utility for the same type of service;
(b) The spouse has, in the last five years and without authorization, interfered
with or diverted the service of a public utility for the same type of service; or
(c) The spouse fails to provide proof of identity, such as government-issued photo
identification and Social Security number.
(2) If a new deposit is required under the provisions of this subsection, the public
utility shall permit the spouse to pay the deposit in installments unless the public utility
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3161 2
shows the spouse has previously interfered with, diverted, or used the service of the
utility without authorization.
3. A public utility may require proper documentation, such as a marriage
certificate or proof of residency, before transferring service to the spouse of the account
holder under subsection 1 of this section.
N
✔
W
A
R
D
H
T
I
W